Florida, session 2026, HB869.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (11) of section
486.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
486.021 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, unless the
context otherwise requires, the term:
(11) "Practice of physical therapy" means the performance
of physical therapy assessments and the treatment of any
disability, injury, disease, or other health condition of human
beings, or the prevention of such disability, injury, disease,
or other health condition, and the rehabilitation of such
disability, injury, disease, or other health condition by
alleviating impairments, functional movement limitations, and
disabilities by designing, implementing, and modifying treatment
interventions through therapeutic exercise; functional movement
training in self-management and in-home, community, or work
integration or reintegration; manual therapy; massage; airway
clearance techniques; maintaining and restoring the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb869-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 869 2026
integumentary system and wound care; physical agent or modality;
mechanical or electrotherapeutic modality; patient-related
instruction; the use of apparatus and equipment in the
application of such treatment, prevention, or rehabilitation;
the performance of tests of neuromuscular functions as an aid to
the diagnosis or treatment of any human condition; or the
performance of electromyography as an aid to the diagnosis of
any human condition only upon compliance with the criteria set
forth by the Board of Medicine.
(a) A physical therapist may implement a plan of treatment
developed by the physical therapist for a patient or provided
for a patient by a practitioner of record or by an advanced
practice registered nurse licensed under s. 464.012. The
physical therapist shall refer the patient to or consult with a
practitioner of record if the patient's condition is found to be
outside the scope of physical therapy. If physical therapy
treatment for a patient is required beyond 30 days for a
condition not previously assessed by a practitioner of record,
the physical therapist shall have a practitioner of record
review and sign the plan. The requirement that a physical
therapist have a practitioner of record review and sign a plan
of treatment does not apply:
1. When a patient has been physically examined by a
physician licensed in another state, the patient has been
diagnosed by the physician as having a condition for which
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb869-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 869 2026
physical therapy is required, and the physical therapist is
treating the condition; or
2. To services provided for purposes of health promotion,
injury prevention, wellness, or fitness.

For purposes of this paragraph, a health care practitioner
licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter
461, or chapter 466 and engaged in active practice is eligible
to serve as a practitioner of record.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb869-00